Washington statutes.
RCW 35.07.170

Receiver—Power to sell property.

The receiver shall be authorized to sell at public auction after such public notice as the sheriff is required to give of like property sold on execution, all the property of the former municipality except such as is necessary for his or her use in winding up its affairs, and excepting also such as has been dedicated to public use.

Personal property shall be sold for cash.

Real property may be sold for all cash, or for one-half cash and the remainder in deferred payments, the last payment not to be later than one year from date of sale. Title shall not pass until all deferred payments have been fully paid.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2006; 1965 c 7 s 35.07.170. Prior: 1897 c 69 s 10, part; RRS s 8923.]